Vermont, session 2025-2026, S35.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REPEAL OF CURRENT PROSPECTIVE REPEAL
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 135, Sec. 5 is repealed.
Sec. 2. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 135, Sec. 6 is amended to read:
Sec. 6. [Deleted.]
Sec. 3. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 135, Sec. 7 is amended to read:
Sec. 7. [Deleted.]
Sec. 4. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 135, Sec. 8(b) is amended to read:
(b) [Deleted.]
VT LEG #379541 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.35
2025 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379541 v.2